California statutes. Penal Code
(j) Until January 1, 2025, persons who, pursuant to Section 4108 of the Food and Agricultural Code, were appointed as
 Museum Security Officers and Supervising Museum Security Officers by the Exposition Park General Manager before March 1, 2022, and have not yet completed the regular basic training course prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

830.75.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 830.7, a person regularly employed as a security officer for an independent institution of higher education recognized under subdivision (b) of Section 66010 of the Education Code may be deputized or appointed by the sheriff or the chief of police of the jurisdiction in which the institution is located as a reserve deputy or officer pursuant to Section 830.6, notwithstanding that he or she is compensated by the institution of higher education or that the assigned specific law enforcement functions and duties may be of a recurring or continuous nature, if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person meets the requirements specified in paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6.

(2) The institution of higher education and the appropriate local law enforcement agency have entered into a memorandum of understanding.

(b) The authority of a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to this section extends to any place in the state and applies only while he or she is engaged in the performance of his or her assigned duties for his or her institution of higher education pursuant to the memorandum entered into pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The primary duty of a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to this section shall be the enforcement of the law upon the campuses of his or her institution of higher education and within one mile of the exterior of those campuses, and in or about other grounds and properties owned, operated, controlled, or administered by that institution of higher
 education.

(c) Vehicles owned by an independent institution of higher education that are specifically designated for use by persons designated as peace officers pursuant to this section shall be deemed authorized emergency vehicles for all purposes of the law within the institution’s jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.   (AB 2361)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

830.8.

(a) Federal criminal investigators and law enforcement officers are not California peace officers, but may exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Any circumstances specified in Section 836 of this code or Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for violations of state or local laws.

(2) When these investigators and law enforcement officers are engaged in the enforcement of federal criminal laws and exercise the arrest powers only incidental to the performance of these duties.

(3) When requested by a California law enforcement agency
 to be involved in a joint task force or criminal investigation.

(4) When probable cause exists to believe that a public offense that involves immediate danger to persons or property has just occurred or is being committed.

In all of these instances, the provisions of Section 847 shall apply. These investigators and law enforcement officers, prior to the exercise of these arrest powers, shall have been certified by their agency heads as having satisfied the training requirements of Section 832, or the equivalent thereof.

This subdivision does not apply to federal officers of the Bureau of Land Management or the United States Forest Service. These officers have no authority to enforce California statutes without the written consent of the sheriff or the chief of police in whose jurisdiction they are assigned.

(b) Duly authorized federal employees who comply with the training requirements set forth in Section 832 are peace officers when they are engaged in enforcing applicable state or local laws on property owned or possessed by the United States government, or on any street, sidewalk, or property adjacent thereto, and with the written consent of the sheriff or the chief of police, respectively, in whose jurisdiction the property is situated.

(c) National park rangers are not California peace officers but may exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer as specified in Section 836 and the powers of a peace officer specified in Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for violations of state or local laws provided these rangers are exercising the arrest powers incidental to the performance of their federal duties or providing or attempting to provide law enforcement services in response to a request initiated by California
 state park rangers to assist in preserving the peace and protecting state parks and other property for which California state park rangers are responsible. National park rangers, prior to the exercise of these arrest powers, shall have been certified by their agency heads as having satisfactorily completed the training requirements of Section 832.3, or the equivalent thereof.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during a state of war emergency or a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, federal criminal investigators and law enforcement officers who are assisting California law enforcement officers in carrying out emergency operations are not deemed California peace officers, but may exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer as specified in Section 836 and the powers of a peace officer specified in Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for violations of state or local laws. In these
 instances, the provisions of Section 847 of this code and of Section 8655 of the Government Code shall apply.

(e) (1) Any qualified person who is appointed as a Washoe tribal law enforcement officer is not a California peace officer, but may exercise the powers of a Washoe tribal peace officer when engaged in the enforcement of Washoe tribal criminal laws against any person who is an Indian, as defined in subsection (d) of Section 450b of Title 25 of the United States Code, on Washoe tribal land. The respective prosecuting authorities, in consultation with law enforcement agencies, may agree on who shall have initial responsibility for prosecution of specified infractions. This subdivision is not meant to confer cross-deputized status as California peace officers, nor to confer California peace officer status upon Washoe tribal law enforcement officers when enforcing state or local laws in the State of California. Nothing
 in this section shall be construed to impose liability upon or to require indemnification by the County of Alpine or the State of California for any act performed by an officer of the Washoe Tribe. Washoe tribal law enforcement officers shall have the right to travel to and from Washoe tribal lands within California in order to carry out tribal duties.

(2) Washoe tribal law enforcement officers are exempted from the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 25400 and subdivision (a) and subdivisions (c) to (h), inclusive, of Section 25850 while performing their official duties on their tribal lands or while proceeding by a direct route to or from the tribal lands. Tribal law enforcement vehicles are deemed to be emergency vehicles within the meaning of Section 30 of the Vehicle Code while performing official police services.

(3) As used in this subdivision, the term “Washoe tribal
 lands” includes the following:

(A) All lands located in the County of Alpine within the limits of the reservation created for the Washoe Tribe of Nevada and California, notwithstanding the issuance of any patent and including rights-of-way running through the reservation and all tribal trust lands.

(B) All Indian allotments, the Indian titles to which have not been extinguished, including rights-of-way running through the same.

(4) As used in this subdivision, the term “Washoe tribal law” refers to the laws codified in the Law and Order Code of the Washoe Tribe of Nevada and California, as adopted by the Tribal Council of the Washoe Tribe of Nevada and California.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 67) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 212.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

830.83.

(a) Commencing on July 1, 2026, until July 1, 2029, a chief of police appointed by a qualified entity enrolled in the pilot program established by Section 11073 and meeting the requirements of a qualified member, or a police officer, public safety officer, or investigator employed in that capacity by a qualified entity enrolled in the pilot program established by Section 11073 and meeting the requirements of a qualified member, is a peace officer. As used in this section, “qualified entity” and “qualified member” have the meanings set forth in Section 11073.

(b) The authority of a peace officer designated pursuant to this section extends to any place within the territorial boundaries of the Indian country of the employing tribe, in
 accordance with and subject to any limitations of Public Law 280 (18 U.S.C. Sec. 1162). The authority of a peace officer designated pursuant to this section may also extend to any place in the state, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) At the request of a state or local law enforcement agency.

(2) Under exigent circumstances involving an immediate danger to persons or property, or the escape of a perpetrator.

(3) For the purpose of making an arrest consistent with Section 836, when a public offense has occurred, or there is probable cause to believe a public offense has occurred, within the Indian country of the tribe that employs the peace officer, and with the prior consent of the chief of police or chief, director, or chief executive officer of a consolidated municipal public safety agency, or person
 authorized by that chief, director, or officer to give consent, if the place is within a city, or of the sheriff, or person authorized by the sheriff to give consent, if the place is within an unincorporated area of a county.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), when the peace officer is in hot pursuit or close pursuit of an individual that the officer has reasonable suspicion has violated or attempted to violate state law and the violation occurred within the Indian country of the tribe that employs the peace officer.

(5) When delivering an apprehended person to the custody of a law enforcement authority or magistrate in the city or county in which the offense occurred.

(c) This section shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this section.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

830.85.

Notwithstanding any other law, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement officers and United States Customs and Border Protection officers are not California peace officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 116, Sec. 2.   (AB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

830.9.

Animal control officers are not peace officers but may exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer as specified in Section 836 and the power to serve warrants as specified in Sections 1523 and 1530 during the course and within the scope of their employment, if those officers successfully complete a course in the exercise of those powers pursuant to Section 832. That part of the training course specified in Section 832 pertaining to the carrying and use of firearms shall not be required for any animal control officer whose employing agency prohibits the use of firearms.

For the purposes of this section, “firearms” includes capture guns, blowguns, carbon dioxide operated rifles and pistols, air guns, handguns, rifles, and shotguns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 82, Sec. 13.   Effective May 3, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

830.95.

(a) Any person who wears the uniform of a peace officer while engaged in picketing, or other informational activities in a public place relating to a concerted refusal to work, is guilty of a misdemeanor, whether or not the person is a peace officer.

(b) This section shall not be construed to authorize or ratify any picketing or other informational activities not otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 3.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

830.10.

Any uniformed peace officer shall wear a badge, nameplate, or other device which bears clearly on its face the identification number or name of the officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1165, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

830.11.

(a) The following persons are not peace officers but may exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer as specified in Section 836 and the power to serve warrants as specified in Sections 1523 and 1530 during the course and within the scope of their employment, if they receive a course in the exercise of those powers pursuant to Section 832. The authority and powers of the persons designated under this section extend to any place in the state:

(1) A person employed by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation designated by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of, and investigations relating to, the provisions of law administered by the Commissioner of Financial Protection
 and Innovation.

(2) A person employed by the Bureau of Real Estate designated by the Real Estate Commissioner, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of the laws set forth in Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) and Part 2 (commencing with Section 11000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. The Real Estate Commissioner may designate a person under this section who, at the time of their designation, is assigned to the Special Investigations Unit, internally known as the Crisis Response Team.

(3) A person employed by the State Lands Commission designated by the executive officer, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of the law relating to the duties of the State Lands Commission.

(4) A person employed as an investigator of the Investigations Bureau of the
 Department of Insurance, who is designated by the Chief of the Investigations Bureau, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of the Insurance Code and other laws relating to persons and businesses, licensed and unlicensed by the Department of Insurance, who are engaged in the business of insurance.

(5) A person employed as an investigator or investigator supervisor by the Public Utilities Commission, who is designated by the commission’s executive director and approved by the commission, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of the law as that duty is set forth in Section 308.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(6) (A) A person employed by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, who is designated by the department’s director, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of laws administered
 by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(B) A person designated pursuant to this paragraph is not entitled to peace officer retirement benefits.

(7) A person employed by the Department of Food and Agriculture and designated by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture as an investigator, investigator supervisor, or investigator manager, provided that the person’s primary duty is enforcement of, and investigations relating to, the Food and Agricultural Code or Division 5 (commencing with Section 12001) of the Business and Professions Code.

(8) The Inspector General and those employees of the Office of the Inspector General designated by the Inspector General, provided that the person’s primary duty is the enforcement of the law relating to the duties of the Office of the Inspector General.

(9) A person employed by the Department of Cannabis Control and designated by the director of the department as an investigator, investigator supervisor, or investigator manager, provided that the person’s primary duty is enforcement of, and investigations relating to, Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code. This section shall apply to only those investigator positions occupied by persons previously designated by the Secretary of the Department of Food and Agriculture as an investigator, investigator supervisor, or investigative manager whose primary duty was to enforce Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person designated pursuant to this section may not carry a firearm.

(c) A person designated
 pursuant to this section shall be included as a “peace officer of the state” under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11105 for the purpose of receiving state summary criminal history information and shall be furnished that information on the same basis as other peace officers designated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

830.12.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, persons designated by a local agency as litter control officers, vehicle abatement officers, registered sanitarians, and solid waste specialists, are not peace officers, may not exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer, as specified in Section 836, and shall not be authorized to carry or use firearms within the scope and course of their employment. These persons may, however, be authorized by the governing board of the particular local agency to issue citations involving violations of laws relating to abandoned vehicles and littering.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

830.13.

(a) The following persons are not peace officers but may exercise the power to serve warrants as specified in Sections 1523 and 1530 during the course and within the scope of their employment, if they receive a course in the exercise of that power pursuant to Section 832. The authority and power of the persons designated under this section shall extend to any place in the state:

(1) Persons employed as investigators of an auditor-controller or director of finance of any county or persons employed by a city and county who conduct investigations under the supervision of the controller of the city and county, who are regularly employed and paid in that capacity, provided that the primary duty of these persons shall be to engage in investigations related to the theft of funds or the misappropriation of funds or resources, or investigations related to the duties of the auditor-controller or finance director as set forth in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 26880), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26900), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 26970), and Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 26980) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(2) Persons employed by the Department of Justice as investigative auditors, provided that the primary duty of these persons shall be to investigate financial crimes. Investigative auditors shall only serve warrants for the production of documentary evidence held by financial institutions, Internet service providers, telecommunications companies, and third parties who are not reasonably suspected of engaging or having engaged in criminal activity related to the documentary evidence for which the warrant is requested.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, persons designated pursuant to this section shall not carry firearms.

(c) Persons designated pursuant to this section shall be included as “peace officers of the state” under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11105 for the purpose of receiving state summary criminal history information and shall be furnished that information on the same basis as peace officers of the state designated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11105.

(d) Unless otherwise specifically provided, this section confers to persons designated in this section the same authority and power to serve warrants as conferred by Section 830.11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

830.14.

(a) A local or regional transit agency or a joint powers agency operating rail service identified in an implementation program adopted pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 130450) of Chapter 4 of Division 12 of the Public Utilities Code may authorize by contract designated persons as conductors performing fare inspection duties who are employed by a railroad corporation that operates public rail commuter transit services for that agency to act as its agent in the enforcement of subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640 relating to the operation of the rail service if they complete the training requirement specified in this section.

(b) The governing board of the Altamont Commuter Express Authority, a
 joint powers agency duly formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, by and between the Alameda County Congestion Management Agency, the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, and the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission, may contract with designated persons to act as its agents in the enforcement of subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640 relating to the operation of a public transportation system if these persons complete the training requirement specified in this section.

(c) The governing board of the Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board, a joint powers agency duly formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, by and between the San Mateo County Transit District, the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, and the City and County of San Francisco, may appoint
 designated persons to act as its agents in the enforcement of subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640 relating to the operation of a public transportation system if these persons complete the training requirement specified in this section.

(d) The governing board of Foothill Transit, a joint powers agency duly formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, by and between the Cities of Arcadia, Azusa, Baldwin Park, Bradbury, Claremont, Covina, Diamond Bar, Duarte, El Monte, Glendora, Industry, Irwindale, La Habra Heights, La Puente, La Verne, Monrovia, Pomona, San Dimas, South El Monte, Temple City, Walnut, West Covina, and the County of Los Angeles, may resolve to contract with designated persons to act as its agents in the enforcement of subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640 relating to the operation of a public transportation system if these
 persons complete the training requirement specified in this section.

(e) The governing board of the Sacramento Regional Transit District, a transit district duly formed pursuant to Part 14 (commencing with Section 102000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code, may designate persons regularly employed by the district as inspectors or supervisors to enforce subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640, relating to the operation of a public transportation system, and any ordinance adopted by the district pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 102122 of the Public Utilities Code, if these persons complete the training requirement specified in this section.

(f) The governing board of a transit district, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 99170 of the Public Utilities Code, may designate employees, except for union-represented employees employed to drive
 revenue-generating transit vehicles, or security officers contracted by the transit district, to enforce subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640, and Section 640.5, and violations of Section 99170 of the Public Utilities Code.

(g) Persons authorized pursuant to this section to enforce subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640, or Section 640.5, or Section 99170 of the Public Utilities Code, shall complete a specialized fare compliance course that shall be provided by the authorizing agency. This training course shall include, but not be limited to, the following topics:

(1) An overview of barrier-free fare inspection concepts.

(2) The scope and limitations of inspector authority.

(3) Familiarization with the elements of the
 infractions enumerated in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 640, and, as applicable, the crimes enumerated in Section 640.5, and Section 99170 of the Public Utilities Code.

(4) Techniques for conducting fare checks, including inspection procedures, demeanor, and contacting violators.

(5) Citation issuance and court appearances.

(6) Fare media recognition.

(7) Handling argumentative violators and diffusing conflict.

(8) The mechanics of law enforcement support and interacting with law enforcement for effective incident resolution.

(h) Persons described in this section are public officers, not peace officers, have
 no authority to carry firearms or any other weapon while performing the duties authorized in this section, and may not exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer while performing the duties authorized in this section. These persons may be authorized by the agencies specified in this section to issue citations involving infractions relating to the operation of the rail service specified in this section.

(i) This section does not affect the retirement or disability benefits provided to employees described in this section or be in violation of any collective bargaining agreement between a labor organization and a railroad corporation.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the primary responsibility of a conductor of a commuter passenger train shall be functions related to safe train operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 392.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

830.15.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 830.33, a person regularly employed as an airport law enforcement officer by Los Angeles World Airports is a peace officer for purposes of Section 830.1 if and when the Los Angeles Police Commission and the Los Angeles Board of Airport Commissioners enter
 into an agreement to enable the Inspector General of the Los Angeles Police Commission to conduct audits and investigations of the Los Angeles Airport Police Division.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Los Angeles World Airports” means the department of the City of Los Angeles that owns and operates the Los Angeles International Airport, the Ontario International Airport, the Palmdale Regional Airport, and the Van Nuys
 Airport.

(c) If the Los Angeles Police Commission and the Los Angeles Board of Airport Commissioners do not take the necessary actions provided in subdivision (a) and do not make a record of that action publicly available on or before April 1, 2014, this section shall
 become inoperative on that date and, as of January 1, 2015, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2015, deletes or extends the dates on which this section becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (AB 128)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Conditionally inoperative on April 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

831.

(a) A custodial officer is a public officer, not a peace officer, employed by a law enforcement agency of a city or county who has the authority and responsibility for maintaining custody of prisoners and performs tasks related to the operation of a local detention facility used for the detention of persons usually pending arraignment or upon court order either for their own safekeeping or for the specific purpose of serving a sentence in that facility.

(b) A custodial officer shall not carry or possess firearms in the performance of his or her official duties. A custodial officer may use a firearm that is a less lethal weapon, as defined in Section 16780,
 in the performance of his or her official duties, at the discretion of the employing sheriff or chief of police, as applicable, or his or her designee. A custodial officer who uses a less lethal weapon shall be trained in its use and shall comply with the policy on the use of less lethal weapons as set forth by the sheriff or chief of police.

(c) Each person described in this section as a custodial officer shall, within 90 days following the date of the initial assignment to the
 position, satisfactorily complete the training course specified in Section 832. In addition, each person designated as a custodial officer shall, within one year following the date of the initial assignment as a custodial officer, have satisfactorily met the minimum selection and training standards prescribed by the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to Section 6035. Persons designated as custodial officers, before the expiration of the 90-day and one-year periods described in this subdivision, who have not yet completed the required training, may perform the duties of a custodial officer only while under the direct supervision of a peace officer as described in Section 830.1, who has completed the training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or a custodial officer who has completed the training required by this section.

(d) At any time 20 or more custodial officers are on duty, there shall be at least one peace officer, as described in Section 830.1, on duty at the same time to supervise the performance of the custodial officers.

(e) This section does not confer any authority upon any custodial officer, except while he or she is on duty.

(f) A custodial officer may do all of the following:

(1) Use reasonable force in establishing and maintaining custody of persons delivered to him or her by a law enforcement officer.

(2) Make arrests for misdemeanors and felonies within the local detention facility pursuant to a duly issued
 warrant.

(3) Release without further criminal process persons arrested for intoxication.

(4) Release misdemeanants on citation to appear in lieu of or after booking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   (SB 324)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

831.4.

(a) (1) A sheriff’s or police security officer is a public officer, employed by the sheriff of a county, a police chief of a city police department, or a police chief of a police division that is within a city department and that operates independently of the city police department commanded by the police chief of a city, whose primary duty is the security of locations or facilities as directed by the sheriff or police chief. The duties of a sheriff’s or police security officer shall be limited to the physical security and protection of properties owned, operated, controlled, or administered by the county or city, or any municipality or special district contracting for police services from the county or city pursuant to Section 54981 of the Government Code, or necessary duties with respect to the patrons,
 employees, and properties of the employing county, city, or contracting entities.

(2) In addition to the duties in paragraph (1), the duties of a security officer employed by the Chief of Police of the City of Sacramento or the Sheriff of the County of Sacramento may also include the physical security and protection of any properties owned, operated, or administered by a public agency, privately owned company, or nonprofit entity contracting for security services from the City or County of Sacramento, whose primary business supports national defense, or whose facility is qualified as a national critical infrastructure under federal law or by a federal agency, or that stores or manufactures material that, if stolen, vandalized, or otherwise compromised, may compromise national security or pose a danger to residents within the County of Sacramento. A contract entered into pursuant to this paragraph shall provide for full reimbursement to the City
 or County of Sacramento of the actual costs of providing those services, as determined by the county auditor or auditor-controller, or by the city. Before contracting for services pursuant to this paragraph, the Sacramento County Board of Supervisors or the governing board of the City of Sacramento shall discuss the contract and the requirements of this paragraph at a duly noticed public hearing.

(b) A sheriff’s or police security officer is neither a peace officer nor a public safety officer as defined in Section 3301 of the Government Code. A sheriff’s or police security officer may carry or possess a firearm, baton, and other safety equipment and weapons authorized by the sheriff or police chief while performing the duties authorized in this section, and under the terms and conditions specified by the sheriff or police chief. These persons may not exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer, but may issue citations for infractions if
 authorized by the sheriff or police chief.

(c) Each sheriff’s or police security officer shall satisfactorily complete a course of training as specified in Section 832 before being assigned to perform his or her duties. This section does not preclude the sheriff or police chief from requiring additional training requirements.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, this section does not confer any authority upon a sheriff’s or police security officer except while on duty, or confer any additional retirement benefits to persons employed within this classification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 164.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

831.5.

(a) As used in this section, a custodial officer is a public officer, not a peace officer, who is employed by a law enforcement agency of San Diego County, Fresno County, Kern County, Stanislaus County, Riverside County, Santa Clara County, Napa County, or a county having a population of 425,000 or less who has the authority and responsibility for maintaining custody of prisoners and performs tasks related to the operation of a local detention facility used for the detention of persons usually pending arraignment or upon court order either for their own safekeeping or for the specific purpose of serving a sentence in the local detention facility. Custodial officers of a county shall be employees of, and under the authority of, the sheriff, except in counties in which the sheriff, as of July 1, 1993, is not in charge of and the
 sole and exclusive authority to keep the county jail and the prisoners in it. A custodial officer includes a person designated as a correctional officer, jailer, or other similar title. The duties of a custodial officer may include the serving of warrants, court orders, writs, and subpoenas in the detention facility or under circumstances arising directly out of maintaining custody of prisoners and related tasks.

(b) A custodial officer has no right to carry or possess firearms in the performance of the officer’s prescribed duties, except, under the direction of the sheriff or chief of police, while engaged in transporting prisoners; guarding hospitalized prisoners; or suppressing jail riots, lynchings, escapes, or rescues in or about a detention facility falling under the care and custody of the sheriff or chief of police.

(c) A person described in this section as a custodial
 officer shall, within 90 days following the date of the initial assignment to that position, satisfactorily complete the training course specified in Section 832. In addition, a person designated as a custodial officer shall, within one year following the date of the initial assignment as a custodial officer, have satisfactorily met the minimum selection and training standards prescribed by the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to Section 6035. Persons designated as custodial officers, before the expiration of the 90-day and one-year periods described in this subdivision, who have not yet completed the required training, shall not carry or possess firearms in the performance of their prescribed duties, but may perform the duties of a custodial officer only while under the direct supervision of a peace officer, as described in Section 830.1, who has completed the training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or a custodial officer who has completed the training
 required in this section.

(d) At any time 20 or more custodial officers are on duty, there shall be at least one peace officer, as described in Section 830.1, on duty at the same time to supervise the performance of the custodial officers.

(e) This section does not confer any authority upon any custodial officer except while on duty.

(f) A custodial officer may use reasonable force in establishing and maintaining custody of persons delivered to the custodial officer by a law enforcement officer; may make arrests for misdemeanors and felonies within the local detention facility pursuant to a duly issued warrant; may make warrantless arrests pursuant to Section 836.5 only during the duration of the custodial officer’s job; may release without further criminal process persons arrested for intoxication; and may release
 misdemeanants on citation to appear in lieu of or after booking.

(g) Custodial officers employed by the Santa Clara County Department of Correction are authorized to perform the following additional duties in the facility:

(1) Arrest a person without a warrant whenever the custodial officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed a misdemeanor or felony in the presence of the officer that is a violation of a statute or ordinance that the officer has the duty to enforce.

(2) Search property, cells, prisoners, or visitors.

(3) Conduct strip or body cavity searches of prisoners pursuant to Section 4030.

(4) Conduct searches and seizures pursuant to a duly
 issued warrant.

(5) Segregate prisoners.

(6) Classify prisoners for the purpose of housing or participation in supervised activities.

These duties may be performed at the Santa Clara Valley Medical Center, or at other health care facilities in the County of Santa Clara, as needed and only as they directly relate to guarding in-custody inmates. This subdivision does not authorize the performance of any law enforcement activity involving any person other than the inmate or the inmate’s visitors.
